en: Herbes de Provence
de: Kräuter der Provence
es: Hierbas provenzales
fi: Provencen yrttiseos
fr: Herbes de Provence
hr: Herbes de provence
it: Erbe della Provenza
lt: Provanso žolelės
nl: Provencaalse kruiden
pl: Zioła prowansalskie

en: Dried Provence herbs
fi: Kuivatut Provencen yrtit
fr: Herbes de Provence séchées
hr: Sušeno Provansa bilje
lt: Džiovintos Provanso žolelės
pl: Zioła prowansalskie suszone

en: Salts, Salt
bg: Сол
ca: Sals, Sal
da: Salte
de: Salze, Salz
es: Sales, Sal
fi: suoloja
fr: Sels
he: מלחים
hr: Soli
hu: Só, Sók
it: Sale
ja: 塩
lt: Druskos, Druska
nb: Salter
nl: Zouten
nn: Salt
pl: Sól
pt: Sais
ru: Соль
sv: Salter, Salt
th: เกลือบริโภค
tr: Tuz
zh: 盐类

en: Coarse-grained salts, Coarse salts
de: Grobe Salze, Grobes Salz
fr: Gros sels, gros sel
it: Sale grosso
nl: Grove zouten
sv: Grovkorniga salter, Grova salter

en: Fine-grained salts, Fine salts
de: Feine Salze, Feines Salz
fr: Sels fins, sel fin
it: Sale fino
nl: Fijne zouten
sv: Finkorniga salter, Fina salter

en: Flake salts, Salt flakes
de: Salzflocken, Salz-Flocken
eo: Lamensaloj
fr: Flocons de sel
hr: Pahuljice soli
it: Fiocchi di sale
ko: 플레이크 소금
sv: Flingsalter, Saltflingor

en: Grinding salts, Salt grinder salts, Salt grinder refill salts
da: Kværnsalte, Møllesalte
fi: Myllysuola
sv: Kvarnsalter, Salter för kvarn

en: Liquid salts
de: Flüssigsalze, Flüssigsalz
es: Sales liquidas, Sal liquida
fr: Sels liquides
hr: Tekuće soli
nl: Vloeibare zouten

en: Rock salts
ar: ملح صخري
da: Stensalte
de: Steinsalze, Steinsalz
eo: Roksaloj
es: Sales de roca
eu: Gatzarri
fr: Sels des mines de sel, Sels gemme
gl: Sal de rocha
hr: Kamena sol
hu: Kősó
it: Salgemma, Sale dalle miniere
lt: Akmens druskos, Akmens druska
mk: Камена сол
ml: റോക്ക് സാൾട്ട്
nb: Steinsalter
nl: Steenzouten
nn: Steinsalt
pl: Sól kamienna
pt: Sal-gema
ru: Каменная соль
sl: Kamena sol
sr: Камена со
sv: Bergsalter, Stensalter
uk: Кам'яна сіль
uz: Toshtuz

en: Himalaya salts, Himalayan salts
bg: Хималайска сол
da: Himalaya-salte
de: Himalaya-Salze
es: Sal del himalaya
fi: Himalajan suolat
fr: Sels de l'Himalaya
he: מלחי הימלאיה, מלח הימלאיה, מלחי הימאלאיה, מלח הימאלאיה
hr: Himalajske soli
it: Sale dell'Himalaya
ja: ヒマラヤ岩塩
lt: Himalajų druskos
nl: Himalaya zouten
pl: Sól himalajska
sv: Himalayasalter

en: Himalayan pink salts
fr: Sels roses de l'Himalaya
hr: Ružičasta himalajska sol, himalajske ružičaste soli
it: Sale rosa dell himalaya

en: Fine-grained Himalayan salts, Fine Himalaya salts
de: Feine Himalaya-Salze
fr: Sels fins de l'Himalaya
it: Sale fino dell'Himalaya
nl: Fijne Himalaya zouten
sv: Finkorniga himalayasalter, Fina himalayasalter

en: Himalayan flake salts
de: Himalaya-Salzflocken
fr: Flocons de sel de l'Himalaya
hr: Himalajske pahuljice soli
it: Fiocchi di sale dell'Himalaya
sv: Himalayaflingsalter

en: Sea salts, Bay salts, Solar salt
bg: Морска сол
da: Havsalte
de: Meersalze, Meersalz
es: Sales marinas
fi: merisuolat
fr: Sels marins, Sels de mer, Sel de mer
hr: Morske soli
it: Sale marino
ja: 海塩
lt: Jūros druskos
nb: Havsalter, Sjösalter
nl: Zeezouten
nn: Havsalt, Sjösalt
pl: Sól morska
ru: Морская соль
sv: Havssalter

en: Coarse-grained sea salts, Coarse sea salts
de: Grobe Meersalze, Grobes Meersalz
fr: Gros sels marin, Gros sels de mer
it: Sale marino grosso
nl: Grove zeezouten
sv: Grovkorniga havssalter, Grova havssalter

en: Fine-grained sea salts, Fine sea salts
de: Feine Meersalze, Feines Meersalz
fr: Sels fins marin, Sels fins de mer
it: Sale marino fino
nl: Fijne zeezouten
sv: Finkorniga havssalter, Fina havssalter

en: Flake sea salts, Sea salt flakes
de: Meersalzflocken, Meersalz-Flocken
fr: Flocons de sel marin
hr: Pahuljice morske soli
it: Fiocchi di sale marino
sv: Flinghavssalter, Havssaltflingor, Flingsalt från havet

en: Iodised salts, iodised salt
bg: Йодирана сол
hr: Jodirane soli
it: Sale iodato
ja: ヨウ素添加塩
lt: Joduota druska
pl: Sól jodowana
sv: Jodberikade salter, Salter med jod
th: เกลือบริโภค เสริมไอโอดีน

en: Iodised flake salts
sv: Jodberikade flingsalter, Flingsalter med jod

en: Iodised flake sea salts
sv: Jodberikade flinghavssalter, Flinghavssalter med jod